Maine, session 132, LD1746.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-S, sub-§2-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 635, Pt. AAA,
§1, is amended to read:
2-A. School-based preventive oral health services. By January 1, 2025 2027, the
department shall provide preventive oral health services through the Maine Center for
Disease Control and Prevention in all public schools in the State. The department shall
establish public-private partnerships between state agencies or public schools and private
corporations, individuals or organizations to allow mobile dental services providers to offer
additional preventive oral health and disease intervention services in public schools.
Sec. 2. Mobile dental services providers in public health districts. The
Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a model to provide for a mobile
dental services provider in each public health district as described in the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 22, section 411, subsection 5, based on the Cumberland County School Oral
Health Project. For the purposes of this section, "mobile dental services" means dental
services provided at a setting other than a permanent dental clinic. The department shall
establish public-private partnerships between the department or school districts and private
corporations, individuals or organizations to initially set up mobile dental services
providers with equipment, supplies, logistics and methods of operation.
Sec. 3. Department of Health and Human Services to provide training and
education to primary care providers. The oral health program within the Department
of Health and Human Services shall provide training and education to primary care
providers on minimally invasive dental disease treatment for infants and small children.
The department shall ensure that all training and education is provided by licensed dental
health professionals. The department shall use guidance from the From the First Tooth
program or its successor program and the American Academy of Pediatrics to encourage
the use of silver diamine fluoride by pediatricians in primary care settings to reduce dental
disease and prevent cavities.
Page 1 - 132LR1212(05)

Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides funding to contract with mobile dental services providers to deliver
services in public schools and provides funding for ongoing training and education for
primary care providers on minimally invasive dental disease treatment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $325,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $325,000
Page 2 - 132LR1212(05)